South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3541.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 39-41-255 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 39-41-255. (A) Every retail motor fuel outlet shall post in a conspicuous place the self-service pump price for each type of gasoline it has available; provided, that such the posted price must shall include either the cash or the credit price but need not include both such these prices. The manner in which the prices are posted must not conflict with any state or local laws or ordinances that regulate the size, use, or placement of billboards or signs. The posting on the pump price mechanism of the price of the type of gasoline available at that pump shall satisfy the requirement of this section. (B) Every retail motor fuel outlet selling fuel for motor vehicles at retail, including gasoline, gasohol, diesel, or blended fuel must charge a price per gallon not stated or computed in fractional cents and must advertise or display this price in like amounts. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect July 1, 2025. ----XX----